Utah statutes.
53-11-116.   Issuance of license and card to applicant -- License period --
Expiration of application -- Transfer of license prohibited.
(1) (a)  The board shall issue a license to an applicant who complies with the
provisions of this chapter.
(b)  Each license shall:
(i)  contain the name and address of the licensee, the classification of
license, and the number of the license; and
(ii)  be issued for a period of two years.
(2) (a)  When the board issues the license, it shall also issue an
identification card the design of which shall be approved by the commissioner
in accordance with Section 53-11-116.5.
(b)  The identification card shall be issued without charge to the licensee if
an individual, or if the licensee is an agency, to each of its licensed
employees and contract employees, and is evidence the licensee and his
employees and contract employees are licensed under this chapter.
(3) (a)  If an identification card issued to a person states on it any bail
bond agencies for which the cardholder works, that person shall return the
card to the employer upon termination of his work relationship with the bail
bond agency licensee.
(b)  Within five days the licensee shall mail or deliver the card to the
commissioner for cancellation.
(4) (a)  When the commissioner notifies an applicant that licensure as a bail
bond recovery agency is ready for issuance, the applicant shall complete the
application process within 90 days.
(b)  Failure to complete the process results in cancellation of the
application and forfeiture of all fees paid to that point.
(c)  Subsequent application by the same applicant requires the payment of all
application and license fees prescribed in Section 53-11-115.
(5)  A bail bond agency licensee shall notify the commissioner of any change
in the name or address of his business and of any change of employees or
contract employees within 30 days after the change.
(6) (a)  All new employees and contract employees of an agency who are
licensed under this chapter shall submit applications on forms prescribed by
the board.
(b)  Upon board approval, identification cards shall be issued without charge.
